Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.420.020

Licensure under the compact.

(1) Licensure under this compact pertains only to the initial grant of a license by the receiving state. Nothing herein applies to any subsequent or ongoing compliance requirements that a receiving state might require for teachers.

(2) Each member state shall, in accordance with the rules of the commission, define, compile, and update as necessary, a list of eligible licenses and career and technical education licenses that the member state is willing to consider for equivalency under this compact and provide the list to the commission. The list shall include those licenses that a receiving state is willing to grant to teachers from other member states, pending a determination of equivalency by the receiving state's licensing authority.

(3) Upon the receipt of an application for licensure by a teacher holding an unencumbered eligible license, the receiving state shall determine which of the receiving state's eligible licenses the teacher is qualified to hold and shall grant such a license or licenses to the applicant. Such a determination shall be made in the sole discretion of the receiving state's licensing authority and may include a determination that the applicant is not eligible for any of the receiving state's eligible licenses. For all teachers who hold an unencumbered license, the receiving state shall grant one or more unencumbered license(s) that, in the receiving state's sole discretion, are equivalent to the license(s) held by the teacher in any other member state.

(4) For active military members and eligible military spouses who hold a license that is not unencumbered, the receiving state shall grant an equivalent license or licenses that, in the receiving state's sole discretion, is equivalent to the license or licenses held by the teacher in any other member state, except where the receiving state does not have an equivalent license.

(5) For a teacher holding an unencumbered career and technical education license, the receiving state shall grant an unencumbered license equivalent to the career and technical education license held by the applying teacher and issued by another member state, as determined by the receiving state in its sole discretion, except where a career and technical education teacher does not hold a bachelor's degree and the receiving state requires a bachelor's degree for licenses to teach career and technical education. A receiving state may require career and technical education teachers to meet state industry recognized requirements, if required by law in the receiving state.

[ 2024 c 317 s 3.]